Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-212
Commercial exploitation, defined.

Commercial exploitation means buying, selling, or bartering for economic or financial gain by any person, partnership, limited liability company, association, or corporation.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 22.